Maine, session 132, LD398.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §682, sub-§18, as amended by PL 2009, c. 16, §1, is further
amended to read:
18. Transient occupancy. "Transient occupancy" means occupancy that does not
exceed 120 150 days in a calendar year.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR1000(03)